District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.09

Interim Disability Assistance Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing, revolving fund the Interim Disability Assistance Fund (“Fund”) which shall be separate from the General Fund and into which shall be deposited funds to be used solely for the purpose of implementing the Interim Disability Assistance program established by § 4-204.07.

(b)

All funds shall be deposited into the Fund without regard to fiscal year limitation pursuant to an act of Congress. All funds deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the General Fund at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the purpose of funding the Interim Disability Act program, subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 409
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1902(b), 49 DCR 6968

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-204.07.